apertium-krl.krl.lexc
LEXICON SYM

¼%<sym%>%<n%>:¼	SYM_.	;
½%<sym%>%<n%>:½	SYM_.	;
¹%<sym%>%<n%>:¹	SYM_.	;
€%<sym%>:€	SYM_.	;
×%<sym%>:×	SYM_.	;
·%<sym%>:·	SYM_.	;
®%<sym%>:®	SYM_.	;
™%<sym%>:™	SYM_.	;
@%<sym%>:@	SYM_.	;
¤%<sym%>:¤	SYM_.	;
¢%<sym%>:¢	SYM_.	;
*%<sym%>:*	SYM_.	;
#%<sym%>%<n%>:#	SYM_.	;
$%<sym%>:$	SYM_.	;
£%<sym%>:£	SYM_.	;
₤%<sym%>:₤	SYM_.	;
|%<sym%>:|	SYM_.	;
¶%<sym%>:¶	SYM_.	;
%%%<sym%>%<n%>:%%	SYM_.	;
+%<sym%>:+	SYM_.	;
♥%<sym%>:♥	SYM_.	;
→%<sym%>:→	SYM_.	;
^%<sym%>:^	SYM_.	;
≤%<sym%>:≤	SYM_.	;
=%<sym%>%<n%>:=	SYM_.	;
≥%<sym%>%<n%>:≥	SYM_.	;
µ%<sym%>%<n%>:µ	SYM_.	;
%;-)%<sym%>:%;-)	SYM_.	;
%;)%<sym%>:%;)	SYM_.	;
%:-)%<sym%>:%:-)	SYM_.	;
%:-#%<sym%>:%:-#	SYM_.	;
%:)%<sym%>:%:)	SYM_.	;
%:#%<sym%>:%:#	SYM_.	;
‘%<sym%>:‘	SYM_.	;
§%<sym%>:§	SYM_.	;
♪%<sym%>:♪	SYM_.	;
☹%<sym%>:☹	SYM_.	;
☺%<sym%>:☺	SYM_.	;
☻%<sym%>:☻	SYM_.	;

´%<sym%>:´	SYM_.	;
`%<sym%>:`	SYM_.	;
±%<sym%>:±	SYM_.	;
−%<sym%>:−	SYM_.	;
~%<sym%>:~	SYM_.	;
_%<sym%>:_	SYM_.	;
\%<sym%>:\	SYM_.	;
‰%<sym%>:‰	SYM_.	;
¥%<sym%>:¥	SYM_.	;
°%<sym%>:°	SYM_.	;
©%<sym%>:©	SYM_.	;
§§%<sym%>:§§	SYM_.	;
%%%<sym%>:%%	SYM_.	;
′%<sym%>:′	SYM_.	;
²%<sym%>%<n%>:²	SYM_.	;
€%<sym%>:€	SYM_.	;
¥%<sym%>:¥	SYM_.	;
,%<sym%>:,	SYM_.	;
#%<sym%>%<n%>:#	SYM_.	;
$%<sym%>:$	SYM_.	;
%<3%<sym%>:%<3	SYM_.	;
³%<sym%>%<n%>:³	SYM_.	;
%:-D%<sym%>:%:-D	SYM_.	;
%:D%<sym%>:%:D	SYM_.	;
m€%<sym%>:m€	SYM_.	;
M€%<sym%>:M€	SYM_.	;
%:-P%<sym%>:%:-P	SYM_.	;
%:P%<sym%>:%:P	SYM_.	;
%:-x%<sym%>:%:-x	SYM_.	;
%:x%<sym%>:%:x	SYM_.	;
%:-X%<sym%>:%:-X	SYM_.	;
%:X%<sym%>:%:X	SYM_.	;
 %<sym%>: 	SYM_.	;

LEXICON X

open%<x%>:open # ;

LEXICON SUFFIX

# ;

LEXICON ABBREVIATION

№%<n%>%<abbr%>:№   # ;
klo%<n%>%<abbr%>:klo    # ;
ven.%<n%>%<abbr%>:ven.  # ;
wwf.ru%<n%>%<abbr%>:wwf.ru # ;

LEXICON ACRONYM

KT%<np%>%<al%>%<acr%>:KT  ACRO_T ;
TV%<n%>%<acr%>:TV  ACRO_T ;
OY%<n%>%<acr%>:OY  ACRO_T ;
WWF%<np%>%<al%>%<acr%>:WWF  ACRO_T ;
AEK%<np%>%<al%>%<acr%>:AEK  ACRO_T ;
PKC%<np%>%<al%>%<acr%>:PKC  ACRO_T ;

!! Puncts etc.

LEXICON PUNCT_NONSTD_DASH_LOOP

:- PUNCT_NONSTD_DASH_LOOP ;
:- # ;

LEXICON PUNCT_NONSTD_EXCL_LOOP

:%! PUNCT_NONSTD_EXCL_LOOP ;
:%! # ;

!! Stems

LEXICON ACRO_T

0 ACRO_SGNOM_0 ;
0:%:  ACRO_CASES ;

LEXICON AUX_O/LLA

0:ll    AUX_INF_A ;
0:llu   AUX_PCP ;
0:lla   AUX_PASSIVE_H ;
0:le    AUX_CONNEG_0 ;
0:le    AUX_PRES_BACK ;
0:ll    AUX_INF_E ;
0:lo    AUX_INF_MA ;
0:l    AUX_PAST_WEAK_BACK ;
0:li    AUX_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:lti   AUX_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:n     AUX_3SG_0 ;
0       AUX_COND ;
0:l       AUX_COND ;

LEXICON AUX_E/I

%<actv%>%<p3%>%<sg%>+ja%<cnjcoo%>:ikä    # ;
%<actv%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:n    # ;
%<actv%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:t    # ;
%<actv%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:i    # ;
%<actv%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:mmä    # ;
%<actv%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ttä    # ;
%<actv%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:lä   # ;

LEXICON AUX_VO/IJA

0:ij  AUX_INF_A ;
0:i  AUX_3SG_0 ;
0:i  AUX_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:i  AUX_3SG_PI ;
0:i  AUX_PRES_BACK ;
0:ija  AUX_PASSIVE_H ;
0  AUX_PAST_WEAK_BACK ;
0  AUX_COND ;

LEXICON AUX_PI/TEÄ

0:te  AUX_INF_Ä ;
0:tä  AUX_INF_MÄ ;
0:ä  AUX_CONNEG_0 ;
0:ä  AUX_PRES_FRONT ;
0:e  AUX_PRES_FRONT ;
0:tä  AUX_3SG_Y ;
0:ti  AUX_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:etti  AUX_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:etä  AUX_PASSIVE_H ;
0:et  AUX_PCP_TY ;
0:tä  AUX_PCP_N ;

LEXICON VERB_J/IÄHÄ

0:iäh VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:iä  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:äi   VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:iä  VERB_PCP_TY ;
0:iäti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_V/IIJÄ

0:iijä VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:iijä VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ie  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:ie  VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:ei  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ieti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ie  VERB_PCP_TY ;

LEXICON VERB_L/UUVVA

0:uuvv VERB_INF_A ;
0:uo VERB_INF_MÄ ;
0:uo  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:uo  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:uoti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:uo  VERB_PCP_TU ;
0:o  VERB_PAST_BACK ;

LEXICON VERB_ŠY/YVÄ

0:yv VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:ö VERB_INF_MÄ ;
0:ö  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:ö  VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:öti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ö  VERB_PCP_TY ;

LEXICON VERB_PIÄS/TÄ

0:t  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:i  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0    VERB_PAST_FRONT ;
0:e  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:ö  VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:sy  VERB_PCP_N ;
0    VERB_PCP_TY ;

LEXICON VERB_KÄ/YVÄ

0:yv  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:y   VERB_INF_MÄ ;
0:yvä  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:y   VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0   VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:vi  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:yti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:v  VERB_PAST_FRONT ;
0:yny  VERB_PCP_N ;
0:y  VERB_PCP_TY ;

LEXICON VERB_S/UAHA

0:uah VERB_INF_A ;
0:uaha VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ua  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:ua  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:ua  VERB_IMPV ;
0:ai  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:a  VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:uati VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_MIET/TIE

0:ti VERB_INF_E ;
0:i  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:ti VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:i  VERB_PAST_FRONT ;
0:itti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:itä   VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:i  VERB_PCP_N ;

LEXICON VERB_LÄ/HTIE

0:hti VERB_INF_E ;
0:he  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:ksi VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:ks VERB_PAST_FRONT ;
0:hetti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:hte  VERB_PCP_N ;

LEXICON VERB_T/UUVVA

0:uuvv  VERB_INF_A ;
0:uova   VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:uu    VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:uu    VERB_IMPV ;
0:oi    VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:o    VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:uoti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:uo  VERB_PCP_TU ;

LEXICON VERB_TU/LLA

0:ll  VERB_INF_A ;
0:lla   VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:le    VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:le    VERB_IMPV ;
0:li    VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:l    VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:lti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:l  VERB_PCP_TU ;

LEXICON VERB_PA/ISSA

0:iss    VERB_INF_A ;
0:ista   VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:kaja    VERB_3SG_U ;
0:kiso    VERB_3SG_U ;
0:kaja    VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:kise    VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:kise    VERB_IMPV ;
0:kisi    VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:kis    VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:isti   VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_NOUŠ/ŠA

0:š    VERB_INF_A ;
0:ta   VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:e    VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:e    VERB_IMPV ;
0:i    VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0    VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:ti   VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_PAN/NA

0:n    VERB_INF_A ;
0:na   VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:e    VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:e    VERB_IMPV ;
0:i    VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0    VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:ti   VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_MÄN/NÄ

0:n    VERB_INF_Ä ;
0:nä   VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ö    VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:e    VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:e    VERB_IMPV ;
0:i    VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0    VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_TARVI/TA

0:t  VERB_INF_A ;
0:čči  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:čč  VERB_PAST_BACK ;
0:ččo  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:če  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:če  VERB_IMPV ;
0:tti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_MERKI/TÄ

0:t  VERB_INF_A ;
0:čči  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:čč  VERB_PAST_FRONT ;
0:ččö  VERB_3SG_Y ;
0:če  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0:če  VERB_IMPV ;
0:tti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_STARINOI/JA

0:j  VERB_INF_A ;
0    VERB_INF_MA ;
0:čči  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:če  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:če  VERB_IMPV ;
0:ti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0 VERB_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_IKÄVÖI/JÄ

0:j  VERB_INF_Ä ;
0  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0  VERB_PRES_FRONT ;
0  VERB_IMPV ;
0:ti  VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:jä  VERB_PASSIVE_H ;


LEXICON VERB_ŠAN/OA

0:o  VERB_INF_A ;
0:o  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:o  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:o  VERB_IMPV ;
0:o  VERB_INF_MA ;
0:otti VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ot  VERB_PCP_TU ;

LEXICON VERB_MUISTEL/EHTOA

0:ehto  VERB_INF_A ;
0:i  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:e  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:e  VERB_IMPV ;
0:e  VERB_INF_MA ;
0:ti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_KAŠV/OA

0:o  VERB_INF_A ;
0:o  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:a  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:a  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:a  VERB_IMPV ;
0:a  VERB_INF_MA ;
0:etti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:et VERB_COND_PASSIVE_TAIS ;

LEXICON VERB_AL/KOA

0:ko  VERB_INF_A ;
0:ko  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:a  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:a  VERB_IMPV ;
0:ka  VERB_INF_MA ;
0:eta VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:etti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;

LEXICON VERB_AN/TOA

0:netti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:to  VERB_INF_A ;
0:to  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:na  VERB_PRES_BACK ;
0:ta  VERB_3SG_U ;
0:na  VERB_IMPV ;
0:ta  VERB_INF_MA ;
0:neta VERB_PASSIVE_H ;
0:netti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:net VERB_PCP_TAVA ;
0:ta  VERB_DRV_MINE ;

LEXICON VERB_PAIS/TOA

0:to  VERB_INF_A ;
0:ta  VERB_INF_EN ;
0:to  VERB_PAST_3SG_0 ;
0:setti VERB_PAST_PASSIVE_H ;
0:ta  VERB_PRES_BACK ;

LEXICON VERB
alkoa%<vblex%>:al  VERB_AL/KOA ;
antoa%<vblex%>:an  VERB_AN/TOA ;
ativoija%<vblex%>:ativoi  VERB_STARINOI/JA ;
himota%<vblex%>:himo VERB_TARVI/TA ;
huaveilla%<vblex%>:huavei  VERB_TU/LLA ;
ikävöijä%<vblex%>:ikävöi  VERB_IKÄVÖI/JÄ ;
investoija%<vblex%>:investoi  VERB_STARINOI/JA ;
jiähä%<vblex%>:j VERB_J/IÄHÄ ;
kantoa%<vblex%>:kan  VERB_AN/TOA ;
kašvoa%<vblex%>:kašv  VERB_KAŠV/OA ;
kilpailla%<vblex%>:kilpai  VERB_TU/LLA ;
kiskoa%<vblex%>:kis  VERB_AL/KOA ;
kunnivoija%<vblex%>:kunnivoi  VERB_STARINOI/JA ;
kuulla%<vblex%>:kuu  VERB_TU/LLA ;
käyvä%<vblex%>:kä  VERB_KÄ/YVÄ ;
lauloa%<vblex%>:laul  VERB_KAŠV/OA ;
luuvva%<vblex%>:l  VERB_L/UUVVA ;
lähtie%<vblex%>:lä  VERB_LÄ/HTIE ;
merkitä%<vblex%>:merki VERB_MERKI/TÄ ;
miettie%<vblex%>:miet  VERB_MIET/TIE ;
mitailla%<vblex%>:mitai  VERB_TU/LLA ;
muistelehtoa%<vblex%>:muistel  VERB_MUISTEL/EHTOA ;
männä%<vblex%>:män  VERB_MÄN/NÄ ;
noštoa%<vblex%>:noš  VERB_AN/TOA ;
noušša%<vblex%>:nouš  VERB_NOUŠ/ŠA ;
painoa%<vblex%>:pain  VERB_KAŠV/OA ;
paissa%<vblex%>:pa VERB_PA/ISSA ;
paistoa%<vblex%>:pais VERB_PAIS/TOA ;
panna%<vblex%>:pan VERB_PAN/NA ;
parantoa%<vblex%>:paran  VERB_AN/TOA ;
piästä%<vblex%>:piäs  VERB_PIÄS/TÄ ;
piäštä%<vblex%>:piäš  VERB_PIÄS/TÄ ;
rakentoa%<vblex%>:raken  VERB_AN/TOA ;
šanoa%<vblex%>:šan  VERB_ŠAN/OA ;
staraija%<vblex%>:starai  VERB_STARINOI/JA ;
starinoija%<vblex%>:starinoi  VERB_STARINOI/JA ;
suaha%<vblex%>:s VERB_S/UAHA ;
šuaha%<vblex%>:š VERB_S/UAHA ;
šuvaija%<vblex%>:šuvai  VERB_STARINOI/JA ;
šyyvä%<vblex%>:šy  VERB_ŠY/YVÄ ;
tarita%<vblex%>:tari VERB_TARVI/TA ;
tarvita%<vblex%>:tarvi VERB_TARVI/TA ;
tiijuššella%<vblex%>:tiijušše  VERB_TU/LLA ;
tulla%<vblex%>:tu VERB_TU/LLA ;
tuomita%<vblex%>:tuomi VERB_TARVI/TA ;
tuuvva%<vblex%>:t VERB_T/UUVVA ;
valita%<vblex%>:vali VERB_TARVI/TA ;
varjella%<vblex%>:varje  VERB_TU/LLA ;
viijä%<vblex%>:v VERB_V/IIJÄ ;
virkkoa%<vblex%>:virk  VERB_AL/KOA ;
vuolla%<vblex%>:vuo VERB_TU/LLA ;
